Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2055.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 53 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 2167.1. Basic tactical operations course.(a) Development and implementation.--The commission shall develop and implement a basic tactical operations course as part of the mandatory basic training required under section 2167 (relating to police training).(b) Course content.--The basic tactical operations course under this section shall include instruction and practical exercises in the following areas:(1) Safe building entry and room clearing procedures.(2) Team coordination and communication during tactical operations.123456789101112131415161718 (3) Threat identification and decision-making under stress.(4) Use of cover and concealment in dynamic environments.(5) Prevention of friendly fire and crossfire incidents.(6) Scenario-based training emphasizing police officer safety, civilian protection and lawful use of force.(c) Applicability.--Completion of the basic tactical operations course under this section shall be a prerequisite for certification as a police officer under this chapter.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2055PN2633 - 2 - 1234567891011